Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska77-27,179
Tax refund setoff; procedure; joint return; how treated.

(1) If the Department of Revenue determines that a person identified as having a delinquent tax liability is entitled to a tax refund:

(a) The Department of Revenue shall transfer the full amount of the refund or the amount equal to any debts owed the state or any of its political subdivisions, whichever is less, as necessary to apply toward satisfaction of the liability;

(b) The Department of Revenue shall transfer the amount of any balance of the refund or the amount certified by the Commissioner of Internal Revenue as delinquent tax liability, whichever is less, to the Commissioner of Internal Revenue; and

(c) Any remaining balance of the refund shall be forwarded to the taxpayer in the usual manner.

(2) In the case of a joint return when only one spouse is a person identified as having a delinquent tax liability, if the Department of Revenue has reason to believe that the spouse having the liability did in fact contribute more or less than the one-half contribution as provided in section 77-27,178, the Department of Revenue shall transfer the amount of the refund deemed attributable to the spouse with the liability as provided in subsection (1) of this section.

Laws 1985, LB 273, § 6.